Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Best Practices for Soliciting Requests for Proposals or Requests for Qualifications

§ 31-7-401.
Applicability.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423 shall apply to every procurement of commodities, supplies, equipment, construction, technology, personal and professional services other than those in Section 27-104-7(2)(f) and (8), state agency employee benefits, supplemental insurance and cafeteria plans, that are solicited by any state agency by a request for proposals or request for qualifications. The following provisions are intended to ensure that the best practices for soliciting requests for proposals or requests for qualifications are implemented. Any agency that is required to receive approval by the Public Procurement Review Board before entering into a personal or professional services contract as provided in subsection (2)(g) of Section 27-104-7 shall implement the best practices specified in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423. The Public Procurement Review Board shall promulgate any necessary rules and regulations to administer the provisions of Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-403.
Conditions for use.

Competitive sealed bidding is the preferred method of procurement; however, if it is not practicable and advantageous, a request for proposals or request for qualifications may be used. The terms “practicable” and “advantageous” are to be given ordinary dictionary meanings. The term “practicable” denotes what may be accomplished or put into practical application. “Advantageous” denotes a judgmental assessment of what is in the state’s best interest.

The following factors shall be considered when determining advantageousness:

The need for flexibility;

The type of evaluations that will be needed after offers are received;

Whether the evaluation factors involve the relative abilities of offerers to perform, including degrees of technical or professional experience or expertise;

Whether the type of need to be satisfied involves weighing artistic and aesthetic values to the extent that price is a secondary consideration;

Whether the types of supplies, services or construction may require the use of comparative judgmental evaluations to evaluate them adequately; and

Whether prior procurements indicate that a request for proposals may result in more beneficial contracts for the state.

The following factors shall be considered when determining practicability:

Whether the contract needs to be a contract other than a fixed-price type contract;

Whether oral or written discussions may need to be conducted with offerers concerning technical and price aspects of their proposals;

Whether offerers may need to be afforded the opportunity to revise their proposals, including price;

Whether the award may need to be based upon a comparative evaluation of differing price and contractual factors as well as quality factors that include technical and performance capability and the content of the technical proposal; and

Whether the primary consideration in determining award may not be price.

On or before January 1 of each year, and every time a chief procurement officer is hired, each state agency shall provide to the state purchasing agent the name of the state agency’s chief procurement officer and information identifying the state agency’s central purchasing office, if applicable. If the chief procurement officer of an agency or his or her designee determines, in writing, that the use of competitive sealed bidding is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state, he or she shall submit a detailed explanation of the reasons for that determination to the Public Procurement Review Board. If the Public Procurement Review Board determines that competitive sealed bidding is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state, then a contract may be entered into for the procurement of commodities, supplies, equipment, construction, technology, personal and professional services, state agency purchased employee benefits or state agency supplemental insurance and cafeteria plans, by a request for proposals or request for qualifications. However, these procurements contracted for through a request for proposals or request for qualifications may not be combined or included in a contract with other procurements that are required to be procured through competitive sealed bidding so as to avoid the statutory obligation for procurement through competitive sealed bidding. The board may modify or revoke its determination at any time, and the determination should be reviewed for current applicability from time to time.

In addition to determining whether a request for proposals or request for qualifications would be practicable and advantageous to the state, when making the decision to use a request for proposals or request for qualifications, the chief procurement officer shall consider the following factors:

Whether quality, availability or capability is overriding in relation to price in procurements for research and development, technical supplies or services;

Whether the initial installation needs to be evaluated together with later maintenance and service capabilities and what priority should be given to these requirements in the best interests of the state; and

Whether the marketplace will respond better to a solicitation permitting not only a range of alternative proposals but evaluation and discussion of them before making the award.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-405.
Content of the request for proposals or request for qualifications.

The request for proposals or request for qualifications shall include the following:

Instructions and information to offerers concerning the request for proposals or request for qualifications submission requirements, including the time and date set for receipt of proposals or qualifications, the address of the office to which proposals or qualifications are to be delivered, the maximum time for proposal or qualification acceptance by the state, the manner in which proposals or qualifications are to be submitted, including any forms for that purpose and any other special information;

The purchase description, evaluation factors, delivery or performance schedule and any inspection and acceptance requirements that are not included in the purchase description;

The contract terms and conditions, including warranty and bonding or other security requirements, as applicable;

A statement that discussions may be conducted with offerers who submit proposals or qualifications determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for the award, but that proposals or qualifications may be accepted without such discussions; and

A statement of when and how price should be submitted.

The request for proposals or request for qualifications may incorporate documents by reference provided that the request for proposals or request for qualifications specifies where those documents can be obtained.

Proposal or qualification preparation time shall be set to provide offerers a reasonable time to prepare their proposals or qualifications. A minimum of thirty (30) days shall be provided unless a shorter time is deemed necessary for a particular procurement as determined in writing by the chief procurement officer of the requesting agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-407.
Public notice.

In addition to any method of public notice regarding the solicitation of requests for proposals or requests for qualifications currently being used by state agencies, the chief procurement officer shall also have posted on the Mississippi procurement portal and on the soliciting agency’s website, public notification of a pending procurement through request for proposals or request for qualifications. The notice shall include the following:

The due date for responses;

The name and phone number of the officer conducting the procurement; and

The means of obtaining the solicitation.

The notice shall be posted at least thirty (30) days before the date that proposals or qualifications are to be submitted to the chief procurement officer, unless a shorter time is deemed necessary for a particular procurement as determined in writing by the chief procurement officer of the requesting agency.

Each chief procurement officer may determine that other methods of public notification are best for that particular agency or that particular request for proposals or request for qualifications. If such a determination is made, the chief procurement officer may provide notice in an alternative manner about the request for proposals or request for qualifications in addition to the methods provided for in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423.

The Department of Finance and Administration (DFA) shall monitor agency websites and the Mississippi procurement portal to ensure that the agencies are posting the required notice. DFA shall audit agencies and report its findings to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees and House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees by December 31 of each year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-409.
Pre-proposal conferences.

Pre-proposal conferences may be conducted to explain the procurement requirements. If a chief procurement officer plans to hold such a conference, he or she shall prominently place the notification in the request for proposals or request for qualifications solicitation. The notification shall include the date, time and location of the conference. If the chief procurement officer decides to hold a pre-proposal conference after the request for proposals or request for qualifications has been sent out, then he or she shall notify all prospective offerers known to have received a request for proposals or request for qualifications.

If a pre-proposal conference is held, it shall be at least fourteen (14) days after the request for proposals or request for qualifications has been issued. In setting the time for the conference, the chief procurement officer shall consider the complexity of the procurement and the potential modifications that may need to be made after the conference and any amendments to the solicitation that the chief procurement officer may need to make after the conference.

The chief procurement officer issuing the request for proposals or request for qualifications shall serve as chair of the conference. Offerers attending the conference shall be required to sign an attendance sheet provided by the soliciting agency. The chair shall announce at the beginning of the conference how the conference is to be handled. The conference shall be recorded. A chief procurement officer may mandate attendance at a conference if he or she feels it is critical to understanding the solicitation. Once the conference is over, the chief procurement officer shall put the recordings from the conference and the questions and answers from the conference in writing and send them to the offerers who received the request for proposals or request for qualifications and post them on the Mississippi procurement portal and the soliciting agency’s website.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-411.
Drafting the request for proposals or request for qualifications.

In addition to the items listed in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423, the contents of a request for proposals or request for qualifications shall also include the following:

A statement that discussions may be conducted with offerers who submit proposals or qualifications determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for the award, but that proposals or qualifications may also be accepted without those discussions; and

A statement of when and how price should be submitted.

The request for proposals or request for qualifications shall indicate, either by the order listed, weights or some other manner, the order of importance of the evaluation criteria.

The request for proposals or request for qualifications, its amendments, the offerer’s proposals or qualifications and the best and final offer shall constitute the contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-413.
Evaluation factors in the request for proposals or request for qualifications.

When the chief procurement officer submits the determination that the use of competitive sealed bidding is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state to the Public Procurement Review Board for its approval, he or she shall include in that submission the evaluation factors that will be used in reviewing the submitted proposals or qualifications. The evaluation factors shall be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board in the same way that the decision to solicit procurements through a request for proposals or request for qualifications must be approved.

The request for proposals or request for qualifications shall state all of the approved evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance. When the chief procurement officer is determining the weights and importance of each evaluation factor, price as an evaluation factor shall be given the highest criteria weighting and at least thirty-five percent (35%) out of the one hundred percent (100%) total weight of all the other evaluation factors. The evaluation shall be based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals or request for qualifications. The evaluation factors used and the weights given to each shall be decided and agreed to by the evaluation committee before the opening of any proposal or qualification. Numerical rating systems shall be used when determining the weight and importance of each evaluation factor. Factors not specified in the request for proposals or request for qualifications shall not be considered. Upon completion of the evaluation, the evaluation score sheets used to review the submitted proposals or qualifications shall be made part of the report required under Section 31-7-423(1).

The following, as appropriate to individual circumstances, shall be used as criteria for evaluating requests for proposals or requests for qualifications under the request for proposals or request for qualifications process described in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423. These factors are not intended to be limiting or all-inclusive, and they may be adapted or supplemented in order to meet a soliciting agency’s individual needs as the competitive procurement process requires.

a. Does the offerer’s proposal or qualification demonstrate a clear understanding of the scope of work and related objectives?

b. Is the offerer’s proposal or qualification complete and responsive to the specific request for proposals or request for qualifications requirements?

c. Has the past performance of the offerer’s proposed methodology been documented?

d. Does the offerer’s proposal or qualification use innovative technology and techniques?

1. Project management:

a. How well does the proposed scheduling timeline meet the needs of the soliciting agency?

b. Is there a project management plan?

2. History and experience in performing the work:

a. Does the offerer document a record of reliability of timely delivery and on-time and on-budget implementation?

b. Does the offerer demonstrate a track record of service as evidenced by on-time, on-budget, and contract compliance performance?

c. Does the offerer document industry or program experience?

d. Does the offerer have a record of poor business ethics?

3. Availability of personnel, facilities, equipment and other resources:

a. To what extent does the offerer rely on in-house resources vs. contracted resources?

b. Are the availability of in-house and contract resources documented?

4. Qualification and experience of personnel:

a. Documentation of experience in performing similar work by employees and when appropriate, sub-contractors?

b. Does the offerer demonstrate cultural sensitivity in hiring and training staff?

Technical factors (Proposed methodology):

Management factors (Factors that will require the identity of the offerer to be revealed must be submitted separately from other factors):

Cost factors (Factors must be submitted separately from other factors unless specifically approved by the Public Procurement Review Board):

1. Cost of goods to be provided or services to be performed:

a. Relative cost: How does the cost compare to other similarly scored proposals or qualifications?

b. Full explanation: Is the price and its component charges, fees, etc. adequately explained or documented?

2. Assurances of performance:

a. If required, are suitable bonds, warranties or guarantees provided?

b. Does the proposal or qualification include quality control and assurance programs?

3. Offerer’s financial stability and strength: Does the offerer have sufficient financial resources to meet its obligations?

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-415.
Evaluation committee.

Evaluation committees shall be used to evaluate request for proposals or request for qualifications and award contracts. Persons appointed to an evaluation committee shall have the relevant experience necessary to evaluate the proposal or qualification. The members of the evaluation committee shall have no personal, financial or familial interest in any of the contract offerers, or principals thereof, to be evaluated.

The names of the members of the evaluation committee shall not be publicly disclosed until their evaluation report as required under Section 31-7-423(1). The members’ names and job titles shall be made available to the public. Where evaluation committee members are not public employees, those members’ names, educational and professional qualifications, and practical experience, that were the basis for the appointment, shall be made available to the public.

Before evaluating proposals or qualifications, each individual participating in the evaluation of a proposal or qualification shall execute a statement in accordance with subsection (1) of this section certifying that he or she does not have a conflict of interest. The statement shall be filed with the chief procurement officer of the soliciting agency, before beginning the evaluation process. The certification shall be as follows:

“I hereby certify that I have reviewed the conflict of interest standards prescribed herein, and that I do not have a conflict of interest with respect to the evaluation of this proposal or qualification. I further certify that I am not engaged in any negotiations or arrangements for prospective employment or association with any of the offerers submitting proposals or qualifications or their parent or subsidiary organization.”

Committee members may conduct their work separately or together.

The committee may use advisors, as it deems necessary to give opinions on evaluating proposals or qualifications, except that such advisors shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. The names of the advisors shall be made public at the same time as members of the evaluation committee as provided in subsection (2) of this section. For the purposes of this section, the term “advisors” shall mean those individuals who provide such significant input to a member or members of the evaluation committee that the advisor’s opinions are fundamental in shaping the committee member’s evaluation of the submitted proposals or qualifications.

The process of establishing weighting criteria and evaluating proposals or qualifications shall result in a finding that a specific proposal or qualification is the most practical and advantageous, price and other factors considered, or that all proposals or qualifications should be rejected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-417.
Receipt and registration of proposals or qualifications.

Submitted proposals or qualifications shall be opened at the time designated for opening in the request for proposals or request for qualifications. Proposals or qualifications and modifications shall be date-stamped or time and date-stamped upon receipt and held in a secure place until the established due date. Electronic proposals or qualifications received will be stored in an electronic lockbox until the time designated for the opening of the proposal or qualification.

As each proposal or qualification is submitted but before those proposals or qualifications are opened, the chief procurement officer shall designate a person to prepare a register of proposals or qualifications, which shall include the number of modifications received, if any, and a description sufficient to identify the supply, service, commodity or other item offered. The designated person shall assign each submitted proposal or qualification an identifying letter, number, or combination thereof, without revealing the name of the offerer who submitted each proposal or qualification to the chief procurement officer or any person named to the evaluation committee for that proposal or qualification. The designated person shall keep the names of the offerers and their identifying numbers or letters, or combination thereof, in a sealed envelope or other secure location until factors not requiring knowledge of the name of the offerer have been evaluated and scored. If the designated person reveals the names of the offerers and the corresponding identifying information before such time, the procurement process shall be terminated and the proposal or qualifications resolicited. The register of proposals or qualifications shall be made part of the report required under Section 31-7-423(1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 9; Laws, 2017, ch. 411, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-419.
Evaluating submitted proposals or qualifications.

The evaluation committee shall evaluate proposals or qualifications only in accordance with the methodology and weighting criteria described in the request for proposals or request for qualifications. Proposals or qualifications shall be initially classified as: (a) acceptable; (b) potentially acceptable, which means reasonably susceptible of being made acceptable; or (c) unacceptable. Offerers whose proposals or qualifications are unacceptable shall be so notified promptly.

Discussions may be held with offerers to:

Promote understanding of the state’s requirements and the offerer’s proposals or qualifications; and

Facilitate arriving at a contract that will be the most practicable and advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals or request for qualifications.

Offerers shall be accorded fair and equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussions and revisions of proposals or qualifications. Any discussions that take place under the provisions of this section shall be recorded and the recordings shall be made public upon award of the contract. The chief procurement officer shall establish procedures and schedules for conducting discussions. If, during discussions, there is a need for any substantial clarification of or change in the request for proposals or request for qualifications, the request shall be amended to incorporate the clarification or change. Auction techniques, revealing one offerer’s price to another, and disclosure of any information derived from competing proposals is prohibited. Any substantial oral clarification of a proposal or qualification shall be reduced to writing by the offerer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 10, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-421.
Best and final offers.

The chief procurement officer shall establish a common date and time for the submission of best and final offers. Best and final offers shall be submitted only once; however, the chief procurement officer may make a written determination that it is in the state’s best interest to conduct additional discussions or change the state’s requirements and require another submission of best and final offers. Otherwise, no discussion of or changes in the best and final offers shall be allowed before the award. Offerers shall also be informed that if they do not submit a notice of withdrawal or another best and final offer, their immediate previous offer will be construed as their best and final offer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 31-7-423.
Awarding the contract.

After proposals or qualifications have been evaluated, the evaluation committee shall prepare a report evaluating and recommending the award of a contract or contracts. The report shall list the names of all potential offerers who submitted a proposal or qualification and shall summarize the proposals or qualifications of each offerer. The report shall rank offerers in order of evaluation, shall recommend the selection of an offerer or offerers, as appropriate, for a contract, shall be clear in the reasons why the offerer or offerers have been selected among others considered, and shall detail the terms, conditions, scope of services, fees and other matters to be incorporated into the contract. The report shall be available to the public at least forty-eight (48) hours before the awarding of the contract.

The chief procurement officer shall publish a notice on the agency’s website and the Mississippi procurement portal summarizing the award of the contract, which shall include but not be limited to, the nature, duration and amount of the contract, the name of the offerer and a statement that the contract is on file and available for public inspection in the office of the chief procurement officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 12, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018.